Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4291.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 13b. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), an employer shall not pay wages to an employee at a rate that is different than the rate the employer pays wages to another employee for equal work on jobs, the performance of which requires equal skill, effort, and responsibility and that is performed under similar working conditions, because of a protected attribute or characteristic of the employee. (2) An employer does not violate subsection (1) if the employer pays wages in accordance with 1 or more of the following: (a) A seniority system. (b) A merit system. (c) A system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production. (d) A factor other than a protected attribute or characteristic. (3) An employer that violates subsection (1) shall not reduce the rate at which the employer pays wages to an employee to comply with subsection (1). (4) As used in this section, "protected attribute or characteristic" means the religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, height, weight, marital status, or any other attribute or characteristic of an individual that is protected under the Elliott-Larsen civil rights act, 1976 PA 453, MCL 37.2101 to 37.2804. Enacting section 1. Section 13 of the improved workforce opportunity wage act, 2018 PA 337, MCL 408.943, is repealed.